src/fst/test/gt-norm2-yamls/V-TA-kîskiswêw_gt-norm.yaml
     PV/ê+PV/wî+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-wî-kîskisotân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ê+PV/wî+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-wî-kîskisotâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-wî-kîskisotâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-wî-kîskisotakok


###FUT+DEF###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/ka+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kika-kîskison # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ka+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kika-kîskisonân
     PV/ka+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kika-kîskisonân
     PV/ka+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kika-kîskisonâwâw

     PV/ka+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kika-kîskisotin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ka+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kika-kîskisotinân
     PV/ka+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kika-kîskisotinân
     PV/ka+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kika-kîskisotinâwâw
